Louisiana, session 2026, HB690.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XIV of Chapter 1 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 17:410.17 through 410.23, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 690 ENROLLED
PART XIV. PROTECTING SCHOOL TAX DOLLARS FROM FUNDING FOREIGN
ADVERSARIES AND FOREIGN TERRORIST ORGANIZATIONS
§410.17. Legislative findings
The legislature finds and declares that the people of Louisiana deserve the
highest assurance that no taxpayer dollars that are collected or spent for education
will be used to support entities with ties to foreign adversaries or foreign terrorist
organizations or their agents.
§410.18. Definitions
Unless otherwise indicated, the following definitions shall apply to this Part,
as follows:
(1) "Agent of a foreign adversary" means an agent directed or controlled by
a foreign adversary or the agent's proxy.
(2) "Agent of a foreign terrorist organization" means an agent directed or
controlled by a foreign terrorist organization or the agent's proxy.
(3) "Education agency" means the state Department of Education, the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, any city, parish, or other local public
school board, any early learning center as defined in R.S. 17:407.33, and any other
state agency that has authority over educational institutions and educational
opportunities for students from early childhood through secondary education
pursuant to this Title or any other provision of law.
(4) "Education service provider" means an individual or a for-profit or
nonprofit organization or entity that contracts with an education agency to deliver
educational, operational, or management services.
(5) "Foreign adversary" means a country specified in 15 CFR 791.4 or a
successor regulation.
(6) "Foreign terrorist organization" means an entity designated by the United
States Department of State as a foreign terrorist organization in accordance with 8
U.S.C. 1189, or a successor law, or by the United States Department of the Treasury
as a "specially designated national" in accordance with 31 CFR 500.306, or a
successor regulation.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 690 ENROLLED
(7) "Vendor of educational products" means an individual or a for-profit or
nonprofit organization or entity that contracts with or sells goods, services, or
technology directly to an education agency.
§410.19. Prohibitions on contracting with foreign adversaries or foreign terrorist
organizations and their agents
A. No education agency shall knowingly contract with an education service
provider or a vendor of educational products who is a foreign adversary, an agent of
a foreign adversary, a foreign terrorist organization, or an agent of a foreign terrorist
organization.
B. No education service provider or a vendor of educational products shall
knowingly subcontract with a foreign adversary, an agent of a foreign adversary, a
foreign terrorist organization, or an agent of a foreign terrorist organization.
C. Knowingly acting as an agent, proxy, or contractor of a foreign adversary
or foreign terrorist organization is prohibited conduct which renders the agent, proxy,
or contractor ineligible to contract with an education agency or a primary contractor
of an education agency.
D. Providing material support or funds to a foreign adversary or a foreign
terrorist organization is prohibited conduct which renders the person ineligible to
contract with an education agency or a primary contractor of an education agency.
§410.20. Suspension of payments to foreign adversaries or foreign terrorist
organizations, their agents, or their subcontractors
A. If an education agency becomes aware that an education service provider
or a vendor of educational products is a foreign adversary, an agent of a foreign
adversary, a foreign terrorist organization, or an agent of a foreign terrorist
organization, the education agency shall immediately notify the attorney general and
suspend payments to the provider or vendor pending due process review as provided
in R.S. 17:410.21.
B. Subject to the due process rights provided in R.S. 17:410.21, if it is
determined that an education service provider or a vendor of education products is
not qualified to contract with an education agency pursuant to this Part, then the
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 690 ENROLLED
provider or vendor shall return any payments received on or after the provider or
vendor became ineligible due to a violation of this Part.
§410.21. Due process rights of education service providers and vendors of
educational products
An education service provider or a vendor of educational products who is
denied a contract with an education agency or has a contract that is suspended
pursuant to this Part is entitled to avail itself of all administrative due process rights
and legal redress as provided in the Louisiana Procurement Code, R.S. 39:1551 et
seq., or the Public Bid Law, R.S. 38:2181 et seq., whichever is applicable.
§410.22. Notice provisions in contracts
Beginning on July 1, 2026, each education agency shall include in all
contracts with education service providers or vendors of educational products a
statement that the provisions of this Part apply to the contract and any payments
made thereto. The contract provision must also require the provider or vendor to
agree not to engage in conduct that would violate any provisions of this Part during
the term of the contract and that such prohibited conduct will result in an immediate
suspension of payments and be subject to debt collection as provided in this Part.
§410.23. Role of the attorney general
A. An education agency may seek the opinion of the attorney general as to
whether or not an education service provider or a vendor of educational products is
prohibited from contracting with the education agency, pursuant to R.S. 17:410.19
or R.S. 17:410.20.
B. If, pursuant to this Part, an education service provider or a vendor of
education products is deemed ineligible to contract or is determined to have engaged
in conduct which renders the provider or vendor ineligible or disqualified under the
contract and the contractor does not return any payments that are recoverable,
pursuant to R.S. 17:410.20, then notice of the recoverable debt shall be turned over
to the attorney general who, in conjunction with the office of debt recovery within
the Department of Revenue, shall institute recovery and collection of the debt.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 690 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.